Utah statutes.
53-10-112 (Superseded 07/01/11).   Director and officers to have peace officer powers.

The director and enforcement officers:

(1)  are vested with the powers of peace officers throughout the several counties of the state, with the exception of the power to serve civil process;

(2)  have the powers and duties of inspectors under Title 32A, Alcoholic Beverage Control Act;

(3)  may serve criminal process and arrest and prosecute violators of any law of this state; and

(4)  have the same rights as other peace officers to require aid in executing their duties.

